Nevada, session 83, AB124.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
-
*AB124*

– 2 –
(a) An elected public officer shall resign that public office
before he or she files nomination papers for any other elective
public office unless the current term of office of the elected public
officer expires less than 12 months preceding the date of the close
of filing nomination papers.
(b) If the elected public officer does not resign as required
pursuant to paragraph (a), he or she shall be deemed to have
resigned, effective on the date of the close of filing nomination
papers.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) A person who is authorized pursuant to NRS 281.055 to:
(1) File nomination papers for more than one elective
office at any election; or
(2) Hold more than one elective office at the same time; or
(b) Any justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace or municipal judge.
Sec. 2. The provisions of section 1 of this act apply to a person
who is an elected public officer on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB124*